West Virginia, session 2025, SB921.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 4F. West Virginia Emergency Medical Services Oversight and Support Act. §16-4F-1. Short title. This Act shall be known as the "West Virginia Emergency Medical Services Oversight and Support Act." §16-4F-2. Purpose. The purpose of this act is to ensure the efficient operation, accountability, and sustainability of Emergency Medical Services (EMS) across the state by mandating oversight, guidance, and support from the Office of Emergency Medical Services (OEMS) to county commissions. §16-4F-3. Duties of the Office of Emergency Medical Services (OEMS). (a) Structure and Guidance.-- The Office of Emergency Medical Services shall:  (1) Develop and implement a standardized framework for county EMS operations;(2) Provide guidance on best practices for staffing, resource allocation, and response efficiency; and (3) Assist county commissions in structuring their EMS services, including those operated by volunteer fire departments.(b) Auditing and Needs-Based Funding. -- The Office of Emergency Medical Services shall:(1) Conduct financial audits of all county EMS services, including those affiliated with volunteer fire departments, to ensure accountability and proper fund allocation;(2) Distribute state EMS funding based on a needs-based assessment, prioritizing counties with limited resources and high call volumes; and(3) Establish financial reporting requirements for all EMS providers receiving state funds.(c) Facility Inspections and Operational Audits. -- The Office of Emergency Medical Services shall:(1) Conduct regular inspections of all EMS facilities, including those operated by county commissions and volunteer fire departments, to ensure compliance with state and federal standards;(2) Audit operational procedures, equipment maintenance, and service readiness; and (3) Provide corrective action plans and assistance for any facility found to be non-compliant.(d) Continuing Education and Training. -- The Office of Emergency Medical Services shall:(1) Oversee and coordinate continuing education programs for EMS personnel;(2) Ensure that training programs meet state and national accreditation standards; and.(3) Offer technical assistance to counties in developing local training programs.(e) County Commission Assistance.-- The Office of Emergency Medical Services shall:(1) Serve as a direct resource for any county commission facing challenges in maintaining or improving EMS services; (2) Provide emergency operational support and recommendations for counties experiencing EMS shortages or failures; and.(3) Facilitate partnerships between counties to improve regional EMS coverage and response times. §16-4F-4. Implementation and Reporting. (a) The Office of Emergency Medical Services shall submit an annual report to the Legislature detailing:(1) The Office of Emergency Medical Services facility inspection results.(2) Audit findings and financial assessments.(3) Distribution of needs-based funding; and(4) Continuing education initiatives.(5) County commission assistance provided.(b) The first annual report shall be submitted no later than December 31, 2026. §16-4F-5 Effective Date. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.